Hawaii statutes.
[§8-13] Lei Day. May 1 of each year
shall be known as "May Day is Lei Day in Hawai‘i"; provided that this
day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday. [L 2001, c 11, §2]

Cross References

State flower and individual island flowers, see §5-16.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next